Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB642.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3255 of Title 58 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3255. Penalties.(a) General violation.--A person violating a provision of this chapter commits a summary offense and, upon conviction, shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than [$1,000] $2,000 or to imprisonment of not more than 90 days, or both. Each day during which the violation continues is a separate and distinct offense.(b) Willful violation.--A person willfully violating a provision of this chapter or an order of the department issued under this chapter commits a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than [$5,000] 1234567891011121314151617 $10,000 or to imprisonment of not more than one year, or both. Each day during which the violation continues is a separate and distinct offense.(c) Authority.--(1) The department may institute a prosecution against any person or municipality for a violation of this chapter.(2) The Office of Attorney General under the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act, or the district attorney of the affected county may institute a criminal proceeding against a person under subsection (a) or (b).(d) Prohibition.--The department may not waive a fine for a general violation under subsection (a) or a willful violation under subsection (b).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0642PN0652 - 2 - 123456789101112131415